District of Columbia statutes.
10-112

Transfer of jurisdiction over property between United States and District of Columbia — Existing laws unaffected.

Nothing in § 10-111 shall be construed to repeal the provisions of any existing law or laws authorizing the transfer of jurisdiction of certain lands between and among federal and District authorities, but all such laws shall remain in full force and effect.

History

May 20, 1932, 47 Stat. 162, ch. 197, § 2

Cross References

Reversion of leases, see § 6-321.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-112.
1973 Ed., § 8-116.